Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2004
Accredited school or college of medicine, defined.

An accredited school or college of medicine means one approved by the board, and such school or college shall meet and maintain generally minimum standards approved by the board. Such minimum standards shall apply equally to all accredited schools, and any school to be accredited shall permit inspections by the department.

A school or college of osteopathic medicine and surgery fulfilling all such requirements shall not be refused standing as an accredited medical school because it may also specialize in giving instruction according to any special system of healing.

Laws 1927, c. 167, § 103, p. 483;

C.S.1929, § 71-1404;

Laws 1943, c. 150, § 21, p. 549;

R.S.1943, § 71-1,105;

Laws 1969, c. 563, § 8, p. 2295;

Laws 1989, LB 342, § 16;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 422;

Laws 1999, LB 828, § 81;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,105;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 662.